Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.025

Right to organize or refrain from organizing.

Employees have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist employee organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and also have the right to refrain from any or all of these activities.

[ 2019 c 230 s 4; 1987 c 314 s 5.]